District of Columbia statutes.
1-350.11

Report to the Council.

On or before March 1 of each year, the Central Collection Unit shall issue a report to the Mayor and the Council that includes:

(1)

The amount of delinquent debt collected in the preceding fiscal year;

(2)

The amount of uncollected delinquent debt owed to the District; and

(3)

A summary of the efforts made to collect delinquent debt owed to the District and the challenges that remain for collecting it.

History

Sept. 20, 2012, D.C. Law 19-168, § 1052, 59 DCR 8025